src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_US_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kus - ENGLISH : # CLASS_US_STEM_3

     kus+V+Interr+Past: kwíijaa
     kus+V+Indir+Past: kwíijaan
     kus+V+Rel+Evid: kwíijaas
     kus+V+Past+NonFact: kwíijaa.ang
     kus+V+Ints+Past: kwíijaaʼahlang
     kus+V+Cont: kwíijaaʼahlanggaa
     kus+V+Ctfact+Pres: kwíijaaʼahlanggang
